Utah statutes.
23-19-38.   Sales of licenses, certificates, or permits final -- Exceptions
-- Reallocation of surrendered permits.
(1)  Sales of all licenses, certificates, or permits are final, and no refunds
may be made by the division except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3).
(2)  The division may refund the amount of the license, certificate, or permit
if:
(a)  the division or the Wildlife Board discontinues the activity for which
the license, certificate, or permit was obtained;
(b)  the division determines that it has erroneously collected a fee;
(c) (i)  the person to whom the license, certificate, or permit is issued
becomes ill or suffers an injury that precludes the person from using the
license, certificate, or permit;
(ii)  the person furnishes verification of illness or injury from a physician;
(iii)  the person does not actually use the license, certificate, or permit;
and
(iv)  the license, certificate, or permit is surrendered before the end of the
season for which the permit was issued; or
(d)  the person to whom the license, certificate, or permit is issued dies
prior to the person being able to use the license, certificate, or permit.
(3)  The Wildlife Board may establish additional exceptions in rule to the
refund prohibitions in Subsection (1).
(4)  The division director may reallocate surrendered permits in accordance
with rules adopted by the Wildlife Board.
